Louisiana, session 2026, HB732.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:8(E) and (F) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§8. Final delinquent debt; office of motor vehicles; temporary waivers and holds
* * *
E.(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
commissioner, or his designee, shall have emergency authority to temporarily
suspend or place on hold, for a period not to exceed thirty days, any fine, fee,
penalty, or license suspension appearing on a person’s driving record when the
commissioner determines that such action is necessary to allow the person immediate
access to life-sustaining medicine or medical treatment.
(2) The person or their representative shall provide documentation from a
licensed physician, hospital, hospice, or other home health provider verifying the
life-threatening nature of the condition.
(3) For the purposes of this Subsection, "commissioner" means the
commissioner of the office of motor vehicles.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 732 ENROLLED
F. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the hybrid
vehicle road usage fee provided for in R.S. 32:461(A)(2) is hereby suspended for
non-plugin hybrids until August 1, 2027. Failure by any person to pay such fee shall
not be considered debt that may be collected pursuant to this Section or any other
applicable collection authority.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.